Indiana, session 2026, HB1103.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-8-7.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.188-2013,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.1. (a) The amendments made to this section
in the 2026 session of the general assembly apply to a:
(1) self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter to provide group health coverage; and
(2) contract with a prepaid health care delivery plan that is
entered into or renewed under section 7(c) of this chapter;
that is issued, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
(a) (b) As used in this section, "covered individual" means an
individual who is:
(1) covered under a self-insurance program established under
section 7(b) of this chapter to provide group health coverage; or
(2) entitled to health services under a contract with a prepaid
health care delivery plan that is entered into or renewed under
section 7(c) of this chapter.
(b) (c) As used in this section, "autism spectrum disorder" means a
2026 IN 1103—LS 6277/DI 154


neurological condition, including Asperger's syndrome and autism, as
defined in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual of Mental Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.
(d) As used in this section, "behavior analysis services" means
services related to the design, implementation, and evaluation of
instructional and environmental modifications to produce socially
significant improvements in human behavior. The term includes
the following:
(1) Empirical identification of functional relations between
behavior and environmental factors through functional
assessment and analysis.
(2) Applied behavior analysis interventions based on scientific
research and the direct observation and measurement of
behavior and the environment.
(3) Use of contextual factors, motivating operations,
antecedent stimuli, positive reinforcement, and other
consequences to assist people in developing new behaviors,
increase or decrease existing behaviors, and emit behaviors
under specific environmental conditions.
However, the term does not include, psychological testing,
diagnosis of mental or physical disorders, neuropsychology,
psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, sex therapy, psychoanalysis,
hypnotherapy, or counseling.
(c) (e) A self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of
this chapter to provide health care coverage must provide a covered
individual with coverage for the treatment of an autism spectrum
disorder. Coverage provided under this section is limited to treatment
that is prescribed by the covered individual's treating physician in
accordance with a treatment plan. A self-insurance program may not
deny or refuse to issue coverage on, refuse to contract with, or refuse
to renew, refuse to reissue, or otherwise terminate or restrict coverage
on, an individual under an insurance policy or health plan solely
because the individual is diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder.
(d) (f) A contract with a prepaid health care delivery plan that is
entered into or renewed under section 7(c) of this chapter must provide
a covered individual with services for the treatment of an autism
spectrum disorder. Services provided under this section are limited to
treatment that is prescribed by the covered individual's treating
physician in accordance with a treatment plan. A prepaid health care
delivery plan may not deny or refuse to provide services to, or refuse
to renew, refuse to reissue, or otherwise terminate or restrict services
to, an individual solely because the individual is diagnosed with an
2026 IN 1103—LS 6277/DI 154


autism spectrum disorder.
(e) (g) The coverage required by subsection (c) (e) and services
required by subsection (d) (f) may not be subject to dollar limits,
deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance provisions that are less
favorable to a covered individual than the dollar limits, deductibles,
copayments, or coinsurance provisions that apply to physical illness
generally under the self-insurance program or contract with a prepaid
health care delivery plan.
(h) If the coverage required by subsection (e) provided to a
covered individual is for behavior analysis services, a
self-insurance program established under section 7(b) of this
chapter to provide health care coverage must reimburse the
provider of behavior analysis services that provides behavior
analysis services to a covered individual at a rate of not less than
one hundred ten percent (110%) of the Medicaid reimbursement
rate for behavior analysis services.
(i) If the services required by subsection (f) provided to a
covered individual are behavior analysis services, a contract with
a prepaid health care delivery plan that is entered into or renewed
under section 7(c) of this chapter must reimburse the provider of
behavior analysis services that provides behavior analysis services
to a covered individual at a rate of not less than one hundred ten
percent (110%) of the Medicaid reimbursement rate for behavior
analysis services.
SECTION 2. IC 27-8-14.2-0.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.1. The amendments made to
this chapter in the 2026 session of the general assembly apply to an
accident and sickness insurance policy that is issued, delivered,
amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. IC 27-8-14.2-3.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.3. (a) As used in this chapter,
"behavior analysis services" means services related to the design,
implementation, and evaluation of instructional and environmental
modifications to produce socially significant improvements in
human behavior. The term includes the following:
(1) Empirical identification of functional relations between
behavior and environmental factors through functional
assessment and analysis.
(2) Applied behavior analysis interventions based on scientific
research and the direct observation and measurement of
2026 IN 1103—LS 6277/DI 154


behavior and the environment.
(3) Use of contextual factors, motivating operations,
antecedent stimuli, positive reinforcement, and other
consequences to assist people in developing new behaviors,
increase or decrease existing behaviors, and emit behaviors
under specific environmental conditions.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) Psychological testing.
(2) Diagnosis of mental or physical disorders.
(3) Neuropsychology.
(4) Psychotherapy.
(5) Cognitive therapy.
(6) Sex therapy.
(7) Psychoanalysis.
(8) Hypnotherapy.
(9) Counseling.
SECTION 4. IC 27-8-14.2-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. If the coverage required under this chapter
provided to an insured is for behavior analysis services, an
accident and sickness insurance policy must reimburse the
provider of behavior analysis services that provides behavior
analysis services to an insured at a rate of not less than one
hundred ten percent (110%) of the Medicaid reimbursement rate
for behavior analysis services.
SECTION 5. IC 27-13-7-0.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.220-2011,
SECTION 457, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.1. The following amendments to
this chapter apply as follows:
(1) The addition of sections 15.3 and 16 of this chapter by
P.L.170-1999 applies to health maintenance organization
contracts that are issued, delivered, or renewed after June 30,
1999.
(2) The addition of section 18 of this chapter by P.L.166-2003
applies to a health maintenance organization contract that is
entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after December 31,
2003.
(3) The amendments made to section 14 of this chapter by
P.L.204-2003 apply to an individual contract or a group contract
that is entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2003.
(4) The amendments made to section 14.8 of this chapter by
2026 IN 1103—LS 6277/DI 154


P.L.226-2003 apply to a group or an individual contract with a
health maintenance organization that is entered into, delivered,
amended, or renewed after June 30, 2003.
(5) The amendments made to section 14.5 of this chapter by
P.L.196-2005 apply to a health maintenance organization contract
that is entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2005.
(6) The amendments made to section 3 of this chapter by
P.L.218-2007 apply to a health maintenance organization contract
that is entered into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30,
2007.
(7) The addition of section 19 of this chapter by P.L.109-2008
applies to an individual contract or a group contract that is entered
into, delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2008.
(8) The amendments made to section 14.7 of this chapter in
the 2026 session of the general assembly apply to a health
maintenance organization contract that is entered into,
delivered, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
SECTION 6. IC 27-13-7-14.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.124-2018,
SECTION 88, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.7. (a) As used in this section, "autism spectrum
disorder" means a neurological condition, including Asperger's
syndrome and autism, as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual of Mental Disorders.
(b) As used in this section, "behavior analysis services" means
services related to the design, implementation, and evaluation of
instructional and environmental modifications to produce socially
significant improvements in human behavior. The term includes
the following:
(1) Empirical identification of functional relations between
behavior and environmental factors through functional
assessment and analysis.
(2) Applied behavior analysis interventions based on scientific
research and the direct observation and measurement of
behavior and the environment.
(3) Use of contextual factors, motivating operations,
antecedent stimuli, positive reinforcement, and other
consequences to assist people in developing new behaviors,
increase or decrease existing behaviors, and emit behaviors
under specific environmental conditions.
However, the term does not include, psychological testing,
diagnosis of mental or physical disorders, neuropsychology,
2026 IN 1103—LS 6277/DI 154


psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, sex therapy, psychoanalysis,
hypnotherapy, or counseling.
(b) (c) A group contract with a health maintenance organization that
provides basic health care services must provide services for the
treatment of an autism spectrum disorder of an enrollee. Services
provided to an enrollee under this subsection are limited to services
that are prescribed by the enrollee's treating physician in accordance
with a treatment plan. A health maintenance organization may not deny
or refuse to provide services to, or refuse to renew, refuse to reissue, or
otherwise terminate or restrict coverage under a group contract to
services to an individual solely because the individual is diagnosed
with an autism spectrum disorder.
(c) (d) The services required under subsection (b) (c) may not be
subject to dollar limits, deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance
provisions that are less favorable to an enrollee than the dollar limits,
deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance provisions that apply to
physical illness generally under the contract with the health
maintenance organization.
(e) If the services required under subsection (c) provided to an
enrollee are behavior analysis services, a group contract with a
health maintenance organization that provides basic health care
services must reimburse the provider of behavior analysis services
that provides behavior analysis services to an enrollee at a rate of
not less than one hundred ten percent (110%) of the Medicaid
reimbursement rate for behavior analysis services.
(d) (f) A health maintenance organization that enters into an
individual contract that provides basic health care services must offer
to provide services for the treatment of an autism spectrum disorder of
an enrollee. Services provided to an enrollee under this subsection are
limited to services that are prescribed by the enrollee's treating
physician in accordance with a treatment plan. A health maintenance
organization may not deny or refuse to provide services to, or refuse to
renew, refuse to reissue, or otherwise terminate or restrict coverage
under an individual contract to services to an individual solely because
the individual is diagnosed with an autism spectrum disorder.
(e) (g) The services that must be offered under subsection (d) (f)
may not be subject to dollar limits, deductibles, copayments, or
coinsurance provisions that are less favorable to an enrollee than the
dollar limits, deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance provisions that
apply to physical illness generally under the contract with the health
maintenance organization.
(h) If the services required under subsection (f) provided to an
2026 IN 1103—LS 6277/DI 154


enrollee are behavior analysis services, a health maintenance
organization that enters into an individual contract that provides
basic health care services must reimburse the provider of behavior
analysis services that provides behavior analysis services to an
enrollee at a rate of not less than one hundred ten percent (110%)
of the Medicaid reimbursement rate for behavior analysis services.
2026 IN 1103—LS 6277/DI 154